bhojpuri.dix
    <pardef n="गेहुँव/ाँ__n_m__rednt_eo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>ाँ<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="d" /><s n="rednt" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>ाँ<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="d" /><s n="rednt" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>ाँ<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /><s n="rednt" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r>ाँ<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /><s n="rednt" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="कुवँव/ाँ__n_m__rednt_eo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ें</l>
          <r>ाँ<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="d" /><s n="rednt" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ें</l>
          <r>ाँ<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="d" /><s n="rednt" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ें</l>
          <r>ाँ<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /><s n="rednt" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नइ</l>
          <r>ाँ<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /><s n="rednt" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="अलुव/ा__n_m__rednt_eo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="d" /><s n="rednt" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="d" /><s n="rednt" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /><s n="rednt" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नइ</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /><s n="rednt" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="क्रोधव/ा__n_m__rednt_eo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="d" /><s n="rednt" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="d" /><s n="rednt" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /><s n="rednt" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /><s n="rednt" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="गोसइंयं/ा__n_m__rednt_eo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="d" /><s n="rednt" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="d" /><s n="rednt" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /><s n="rednt" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /><s n="rednt" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="सरसँउव/ाँ__n_m__rednt_eo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ेँ</l>
          <r>ाँ<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="d" /><s n="rednt" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नो</l>
          <r>ाँ<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="d" /><s n="rednt" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ेँ</l>
          <r>ाँ<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /><s n="rednt" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r>ाँ<s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /><s n="rednt" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="लड़किय/ा__n_f__rednt_eo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="d" /><s n="rednt" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नइ</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="d" /><s n="rednt" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /><s n="rednt" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नइ</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /><s n="rednt" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="रतिय/ा__n_f__rednt_eo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="d" /><s n="rednt" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="d" /><s n="rednt" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /><s n="rednt" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नइ</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /><s n="rednt" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="लउव/ा__n_f__rednt_eo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="d" /><s n="rednt" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="d" /><s n="rednt" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /><s n="rednt" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /><s n="rednt" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="गुड़ियव/ा__n_f__rednt_eo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इ</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="d" /><s n="rednt" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इ</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="d" /><s n="rednt" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इ</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /><s n="rednt" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नइ</l>
          <r>ा<s n="n" /><s n="f" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /><s n="rednt" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="गेहुँव">
      <i>गेहुँव</i>
      <par n="गेहुँव/ाँ__n_m__rednt_eo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="कुवँव">
      <i>कुवँव</i>
      <par n="कुवँव/ाँ__n_m__rednt_eo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="अलुव">
      <i>अलुव</i>
      <par n="अलुव/ा__n_m__rednt_eo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="सत्रुव">
      <i>सत्रुव</i>
      <par n="अलुव/ा__n_m__rednt_eo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="अदमिय">
      <i>अदमिय</i>
      <par n="अलुव/ा__n_m__rednt_eo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="कविय">
      <i>कविय</i>
      <par n="अलुव/ा__n_m__rednt_eo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="खर्चव">
      <i>खर्चव</i>
      <par n="अलुव/ा__n_m__rednt_eo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="घरव">
      <i>घरव</i>
      <par n="अलुव/ा__n_m__rednt_eo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="सोनरव">
      <i>सोनरव</i>
      <par n="अलुव/ा__n_m__rednt_eo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="रजव">
      <i>रजव</i>
      <par n="अलुव/ा__n_m__rednt_eo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="क्रोधव">
      <i>क्रोधव</i>
      <par n="क्रोधव/ा__n_m__rednt_eo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="गोसइंयं">
      <i>गोसइंयं</i>
      <par n="गोसइंयं/ा__n_m__rednt_eo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="सरसँउव">
      <i>सरसँउव</i>
      <par n="सरसँउव/ाँ__n_m__rednt_eo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="लड़किय">
      <i>लड़किय</i>
      <par n="लड़किय/ा__n_f__rednt_eo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="मइय">
      <i>मइय</i>
      <par n="लड़किय/ा__n_f__rednt_eo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="औरतिय">
      <i>औरतिय</i>
      <par n="लड़किय/ा__n_f__rednt_eo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="रतिय">
      <i>रतिय</i>
      <par n="रतिय/ा__n_f__rednt_eo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="भसव">
      <i>भसव</i>
      <par n="रतिय/ा__n_f__rednt_eo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="सक्तिय">
      <i>सक्तिय</i>
      <par n="रतिय/ा__n_f__rednt_eo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="बहुव">
      <i>बहुव</i>
      <par n="रतिय/ा__n_f__rednt_eo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="भोरव">
      <i>भोरव</i>
      <par n="रतिय/ा__n_f__rednt_eo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="लउव">
      <i>लउव</i>
      <par n="लउव/ा__n_f__rednt_eo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="गुड़ियव">
      <i>गुड़ियव</i>
      <par n="गुड़ियव/ा__n_f__rednt_eo" />
    </e>
